Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1105, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 148, O.S.L. 2025 (47 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1105), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1105. A. As used in the Oklahoma Vehicle License and
Registration Act:
1. "Salvage vehicle" means any vehicle which is within the last
ten (10) model years and which has been damaged by collision or
other occurrence to the extent that the cost of repairing the
vehicle for safe operation on the highway exceeds sixty percent

(60%) of its fair market value, as defined by Section 1111 of this
title, immediately prior to the damage. For purposes of this
section, actual repair costs shall only include labor and parts for
actual damage to the suspension, motor, transmission, frame or
unibody and designated structural components;
2. "Rebuilt vehicle" means any salvage vehicle which has been
rebuilt and inspected for the purpose of registration and title;
3. "Flood-damaged vehicle" means a salvage or rebuilt vehicle
which was damaged by flooding or a vehicle which was submerged at a
level to or above the dashboard of the vehicle and on which an
amount of loss was paid by the insurer;
4. "Unidentifiable" means that the uniqueness of a motor
vehicle or motor vehicle part cannot be established by either expert
law enforcement investigative personnel specially trained and
experienced in motor vehicle theft investigative procedures and
motor vehicle identification examination techniques, or by expert
employees of not-for-profit motor vehicle theft prevention agencies
specially trained and experienced in motor vehicle theft
investigative procedures and motor vehicle identification
examination techniques;
5. "Unrecovered-theft vehicle" means a vehicle which has been
stolen and not yet recovered;
5. 6. "Recovered-theft vehicle" means a vehicle, including a
salvage or rebuilt vehicle, which was recovered from a theft; and
6. 7. "Junked vehicle" means any vehicle which is incapable of
operation or use on the highway, has no resale value except as a
source of parts or scrap and has an eighty percent (80%) loss in
fair market value.
B. The owner of every vehicle in this state shall possess a
certificate of title as proof of ownership of such vehicle, except
those vehicles registered pursuant to Section 1120 of this title and
trailers registered pursuant to Section 1133 of this title,
previously titled by anyone in another state and engaged in
interstate commerce, and except as provided in subsection M of this
section. Except for owners that possess an agricultural exemption
permit pursuant to Section 1358.1 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma
Statutes, the owner of an all-terrain vehicle or a motorcycle used
exclusively off roads or highways in this state which is purchased
ENR. H. B. NO. 3148 Page 2

or the ownership of which is transferred on or after July 1, 2005,
and the owner of a utility vehicle used exclusively off roads and
highways in this state which is purchased or the ownership of which
is transferred on or after July 1, 2008, shall possess a certificate
of title as proof of ownership. Any person possessing an
agricultural exemption permit and owning an all-terrain vehicle or a
motorcycle used exclusively off roads or highways in this state
which is purchased or the ownership of which is transferred on or
after July 1, 2008, shall possess a certificate of title as proof of
ownership. Upon receipt of proper application information by such
owner, Service Oklahoma shall issue an original or transfer
certificate of title. Until July 1, 2008, any security interest in
an all-terrain vehicle that attached and was perfected before July
1, 2005, and that has not otherwise terminated shall remain
perfected, and shall take priority over any subsequently perfected
security interest in the same all-terrain vehicle, notwithstanding
that a certificate of title may have been issued with respect to the
same all-terrain vehicle on or after July 1, 2005, and that a lien
may have been recorded on said certificate of title. There shall be
eight types of certificates of title:
1. Original title for any motor vehicle which is not a
remanufactured, salvage, unrecovered-theft, rebuilt, rebodied or
junked vehicle;
2. Salvage title for any motor vehicle which is a salvage
vehicle or is specified as a salvage vehicle or the equivalent
thereof on a certificate of title from another state;
3. Rebuilt title for any motor vehicle which is a rebuilt
vehicle;
4. Junked title for any motor vehicle which is a junked vehicle
or is specified as a junked vehicle or the equivalent thereof on a
certificate of title from another state;
5. Classic title for any motor vehicle, except a junked
vehicle, which is twenty-five (25) model years or older;
6. Remanufactured title for any vehicle which is a
remanufactured vehicle;
7. Unrecovered-theft title for any motor vehicle which has been
stolen and not recovered; and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3148 Page 3

8. Rebodied title for any motor vehicle which is a rebodied
vehicle.
Application for a certificate of title, whether the initial
certificate of title or a duplicate, may be made to Service Oklahoma
or any licensed operator. When application is made with a licensed
operator, the application information shall be transmitted either
electronically or by mail to Service Oklahoma by the licensed
operator. If the application information is transmitted
electronically, the licensed operator shall forward the required
application along with evidence of ownership, where required, by
mail. Where the transmission of application information cannot be
performed electronically, Service Oklahoma is authorized to provide
postage paid envelopes to licensed operators for the purpose of
mailing the application along with evidence of ownership, where
required. Service Oklahoma shall upon receipt of proper application
information issue an Oklahoma certificate of title. The
certificates may be mailed to the applicant. Upon issuance of a
certificate of title, Service Oklahoma shall provide the appropriate
licensed operator with confirmation of such issuance.
C. 1. The application for certificate of title shall be upon a
blank form furnished by Service Oklahoma, containing:
a. a full description of the vehicle,
b. the manufacturer's serial or other identification
number,
c. the motor number and the date on which first sold by
the manufacturer or dealer to the owner,
d. any distinguishing marks,
e. a statement of the applicant's source of title,
f. any security interest upon the vehicle, and
g. such other information as Service Oklahoma may
require.
2. The application for a certificate of title for a vehicle
which is within the last seven (7) model years shall require a
declaration as to whether the vehicle has been damaged by collision
or other occurrence and whether the vehicle has been recovered from
ENR. H. B. NO. 3148 Page 4

theft and the extent of the damage to the vehicle. The declaration
shall be made by the owner of a vehicle if:
a. the vehicle has been damaged or stolen,
b. the owner did or did not receive any payment for the
loss from an insurer, or
c. the vehicle is titled or registered in a state that
does not classify the vehicle or brand the title
because of damage to or loss of the vehicle similar to
the classifications or brands utilized by this state.
The declaration shall be based upon the best information and
knowledge of the owner and shall be in addition to the requirements
specified in paragraph 1 of this subsection. Service Oklahoma shall
not issue a certificate of title for a vehicle which is subject to
the provisions of this paragraph without the required declaration,
completed and signed by the owner of the vehicle. Upon receipt of
an application without the properly completed declaration, Service
Oklahoma shall return the application to the applicant with notice
that the title may not be issued without the required declaration.
Nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit Service Oklahoma from
recognizing the type of or brand on a title or other ownership
document issued by another state or the inspection conducted in
another state and issuing the appropriate certificate of title for
the vehicle.
3. The certificate of title shall have the following security
features:
a. intaglio printing or security thread, with or without
watermark,
b. latent images,
c. fluorescent inks,
d. micro print,
e. void background, and
f. color coding.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3148 Page 5

4. Each title issued pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma
Vehicle License and Registration Act shall be color coded as
determined by Service Oklahoma.
5. The certificate of title shall be of such size and design
and color as Service Oklahoma may direct pursuant to the provisions
of this section. The title shall be on colored paper or other
material as designated by Service Oklahoma and be of such intensity
or hue as will allow easy identification as to whether the title is
an original title, a salvage title, a rebuilt title, remanufactured
title, rebodied title or a junked title. The type of title shall be
identified on the front of the certificate of title. The original
title, rebuilt title, remanufactured title, an unrecovered-theft
title, rebodied title or classic title shall be identified by the
word "Original", "Rebuilt", "Remanufactured", "Unrecovered Theft",
"Rebodied" or "Classic" printed in the upper right quadrant of the
certificate of title, in the space which is currently captioned
"type of title". A rebodied title shall also identify on the front
of the title the year, make and model of the originally manufactured
vehicle which has been rebodied and display a notation that reads as
follows: "This vehicle has been assembled with new major components
licensed by the original manufacturer."
D. 1. To obtain an original certificate of title for a vehicle
that is being registered for the first time in this state which has
not been previously registered in any other state, the applicant
shall be required to deliver, as evidence of ownership, a
manufacturer's certificate of origin properly assigned by the
manufacturer, distributor, or dealer licensed in this or any other
state shown thereon to be the last transferee to the applicant upon
a form to be prescribed and approved by Service Oklahoma. A
manufacturer's certificate of origin shall contain:
a. the manufacturer's serial or other identification
number,
b. date on which first sold by the manufacturer to the
dealer,
c. any distinguishing marks including model and the year
same was made,
d. a statement of any security interests upon the
vehicle, and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3148 Page 6

e. such other information as Service Oklahoma may
require.
2. The manufacturer's certificate of origin shall have the
following security features:
a. intaglio printing or security thread, with or without
watermark,
b. latent images,
c. fluorescent inks,
d. micro print, and
e. void background.
E. In the absence of a dealer's or manufacturer's number,
Service Oklahoma may assign such identifying number to the vehicle,
which shall be permanently stamped, burned or pressed or attached
into the vehicle, and a certificate of title shall be delivered to
the applicant upon payment of all fees and taxes, and the remaining
copies shall be permanently filed and indexed by Service Oklahoma.
Service Oklahoma shall assign an identifying number to any rebuilt
vehicle if the vehicle identification number displayed on the
rebuilt vehicle does not accurately describe the vehicle as rebuilt.
The licensed operator, at the time of inspection of the rebuilt
vehicle pursuant to Section 1111 of this title, shall identify the
make, model, and year for the body to accurately describe the
rebuilt vehicle. At the time of the inspection, an appropriate
identifying number shall be permanently stamped, burned, pressed, or
attached on the rebuilt vehicle. The assigned identifying number
shall be recorded on the certificate of title for the rebuilt
vehicle. The dealer's or manufacturer's vehicle identification
number on the rebuilt vehicle shall be preserved in the computer
files of Service Oklahoma for at least five (5) years.
F. When registering for the first time in this state a vehicle
which was not originally manufactured for sale in the United States,
to obtain a certificate of title, Service Oklahoma shall require the
applicant to deliver:
1. As evidence of ownership, if the vehicle has not previously
been titled in the United States, the documents constituting valid
proof of ownership in the country in which the vehicle was
ENR. H. B. NO. 3148 Page 7

originally purchased, together with a notarized translation of any
such documents; and
2. As evidence of compliance with federal law, copies of the
bond release letters for the vehicle issued by the United States
Environmental Protection Agency and the United States Department of
Transportation, together with a receipt issued by the Internal
Revenue Service indicating that the applicable federal gas guzzler
tax has been paid.
Service Oklahoma shall not issue a certificate of title for a
vehicle which is subject to the provisions of this paragraph without
the required documentation from agencies of the United States and
evidence of ownership. Upon receipt of an application without the
required documentation, Service Oklahoma shall return the
application to the applicant with notice that the certificate of
title may not be issued without the required documentation. Nothing
in this paragraph shall prohibit Service Oklahoma from issuing
certificates of title for antique or classic vehicles not driven
upon the public streets, roads, or highways, for mini-trucks
registered pursuant to Section 1151.3 of this title, or for medium-
speed electric vehicles.
G. When registering in this state a vehicle which was titled in
another state and which title contains the name of a secured party
on the face of the other state certificate of title, or such state
certificate is being held by the secured party in that state or any
other state, Service Oklahoma or the licensed operator shall
complete a lien entry form as prescribed by Service Oklahoma. The
owner of such vehicle shall file an affidavit with Service Oklahoma
or the licensed operator stating that title to the vehicle is being
held by a secured party, has not been issued pursuant to the laws of
the state where titled, and that there is an existing lien or
encumbrance on the vehicle. The current name and address of the
secured party or lienholder shall also be stated in the affidavit.
The form of the affidavit shall be prescribed by Service Oklahoma
and contain any other information deemed necessary by Service
Oklahoma. A statement of the lien or encumbrance shall be included
on the Oklahoma certificate of title and the lien or encumbrance
shall be deemed continuously perfected as though it had been
perfected pursuant to Section 1110 of this title. For completing
the lien entry form and recording the security interest on the
certificate of title, Service Oklahoma or the licensed operator
shall collect a fee of Three Dollars ($3.00) which shall be in
addition to other fees provided by the Oklahoma Vehicle License and
ENR. H. B. NO. 3148 Page 8

Registration Act. The fee, if collected by the licensed operator
pursuant to this subsection, shall be retained by the licensed
operator.
H. The charge for each certificate of title issued, except for
junked titles as defined in paragraph 4 of subsection B of this
section, shall be Eleven Dollars ($11.00), which charge shall be in
addition to any other fees or taxes imposed by law for such vehicle.
One Dollar ($1.00) of each such charge shall be deposited in the
Oklahoma Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund through December 31,
2022, and beginning January 1, 2023, it shall be deposited in the
Service Oklahoma Reimbursement Fund. However, the charge shall not
apply to any vehicle which is to be registered in this state
pursuant to the provisions of Section 1120 or 1133 of this title and
which was registered in another state at least sixty (60) days prior
to the time it is required to be registered in this state. When an
insurer requests a salvage or junk title in the name of the insurer
resulting from the settlement of a total loss claim and upon
presentation of appropriate proof of loss documentation as required
by Service Oklahoma, such transfer may be processed as one title
transaction, without first requiring issuance of a replacement
certificate of title in the name of the vehicle owner. The fee
shall be Twenty-two Dollars ($22.00). Two Dollars ($2.00) of this
fee shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Tax Commission Reimbursement
Fund.
I. The vehicle identification number of a junked vehicle shall
be preserved in the computer files of Service Oklahoma for a period
of not less than five (5) years. The charge of junked titles as
defined in paragraph 4 of subsection B of this section shall be Four
Dollars ($4.00). The fee remitted to the Tax Commission shall be
deposited in the Oklahoma Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund through
December 31, 2022, and beginning January 1, 2023, this fee shall be
deposited in the Service Oklahoma Reimbursement Fund.
J. If a vehicle is sold to a resident of another state
destroyed, dismantled, or ceases to be used as a vehicle, the owner
shall immediately notify Service Oklahoma. Absent evidence to the
contrary, failure to notify Service Oklahoma shall be prima facie
evidence that the vehicle has been in continuous operation in this
state.
K. If a vehicle is stolen, the owner shall immediately notify
the appropriate law enforcement agency. Immediately after receiving
ENR. H. B. NO. 3148 Page 9

such notification, the law enforcement agency shall notify Service
Oklahoma.
L. Except for all-terrain vehicles, utility vehicles and
motorcycles used exclusively for off-road use, no title for an out-
of-state vehicle, except any commercial truck or truck-tractor
registered pursuant to Section 1120 of this title which is engaged
in interstate commerce or any trailer or semitrailer registered
pursuant to Section 1133 of this title which is engaged in
interstate commerce, shall be issued without an inspection of such
vehicle and payment of a fee of Four Dollars ($4.00) for such
inspection; provided, Service Oklahoma may enter into reciprocal
agreements with other states for such inspections to be performed at
locations outside the boundaries of this state for vehicles which:
1. Are offered for sale at auction;
2. Have been solely used as vehicles for rent under the
ownership of a licensed motor vehicle dealer or a person engaged in
the business of renting motor vehicles; or
3. Have not been registered in this or any other state for more
than one (1) year.
The inspection shall include a comparison of the vehicle
identification number on the vehicle with the number recorded on the
ownership records and the recording of the actual odometer reading
on the vehicle. An establishment engaged in vehicle rentals or
leasing as defined or classified in the NAICS Manual under Industry
No. 532111 or 532112, shall be exempt from the inspection required
pursuant to this subsection; provided, the establishment shall be
required to submit payment of any fees required pursuant to this
subsection when the title is issued. The four-dollar fee shall be
collected by the licensed operator or Service Oklahoma when the
title is issued. The licensed operator shall retain Two Dollars
($2.00). The remaining Two Dollars ($2.00) shall be deposited in
the Service Oklahoma Reimbursement Fund.
Service Oklahoma may allow the inspection to be performed at a
location out-of-state by another state's department of motor
vehicles or state police.
M. No title for any out-of-state vehicle offered for sale at
salvage pools, salvage disposal sales, or an auction, or by a
licensed dealer or a licensed automotive dismantler and parts
ENR. H. B. NO. 3148 Page 10

recycler, shall be issued without unless an inspection has been
conducted to compare the vehicle identification number on the
vehicle with the number recorded on the ownership record and to
record the actual odometer reading on the vehicle. Upon request of
the seller, person or entity conducting an auction, dealer or
licensed dismantler, the inspection shall be conducted at the
location or place of business of the sale, auction, dealer, or the
dismantler. The inspection shall be conducted by any licensed
operator or a duly authorized employee thereof; provided, if Such an
inspection may be completed by an employee of the salvage pool,
salvage disposal sale, auction, licensed dealer, licensed automotive
dismantler and parts recycler, or a licensed operator. If the
vehicle identification number on the vehicle offered for sale at
salvage pools, salvage disposal sales or a classic or antique or
auction does not match the number recorded on the ownership record,
the an inspection may shall be conducted at the location of or place
of business of such sale or auction by any state, county or city law
enforcement officer or an agent of the National Insurance Crime
Bureau at the location of or place of business of such sale or
auction or as specified by the state, county, or city law
enforcement officer or agent of the National Insurance Crime Bureau.
Service Oklahoma may enter into reciprocal agreements with other
states for authorize such inspections to be performed at locations
outside the boundaries of this state for vehicles which:
1. Are offered for sale at auction;
2. Have been solely used as vehicles for rent under the
ownership of a licensed motor vehicle dealer or a person engaged in
the business of renting motor vehicles; or
3. Have not been registered in this or any other state for more
than one (1) year.
The inspection shall be certified upon forms prescribed by Service
Oklahoma. The name and other identification of the authorized
person conducting the inspection shall be legibly printed or typed
on the form. Prior to any inspection by any employee of a licensed
operator, the licensed operator salvage pool, salvage disposal sale,
auction, licensed dealer, licensed automotive dismantler and parts
recycler, the employing entity shall notify Service Oklahoma of the
name and any other identification information requested by Service
Oklahoma of the authorized person. A signature specimen of the
authorized person shall be submitted to Service Oklahoma by the
employing licensed operator entity. If the authorization to inspect
ENR. H. B. NO. 3148 Page 11

vehicles is withdrawn or the employer-employee relationship is
terminated, the licensed operator employing entity, immediately,
shall notify Service Oklahoma and return any remaining inspection
forms to Service Oklahoma. The fee for the inspection performed by
a licensed operator shall be Four Dollars ($4.00). The licensed
operator shall retain Three Dollars ($3.00) of the fee. The fee for
an inspection performed by employees of salvage pools, salvage
disposal sales, auctions, licensed dealers, or licensed automotive
dismantler and parts recyclers shall be One Dollar ($1.00) and shall
not be retained but remitted to Service Oklahoma for deposit into
the Service Oklahoma Reimbursement Fund pursuant to Section 3-106 of
this title. Fees received by a licensed operator or an authorized
employee thereof shall be handled and accounted for in the manner as
prescribed by law for any other fees paid to or received by a
licensed operator. Out-of-state vehicles brought into this state by
a person licensed in another state to sell new or used vehicles to
be sold within this state at a motor vehicle auction which is
limited to dealer-to-dealer transactions shall not be required to be
inspected, unless the vehicle is purchased by an Oklahoma licensed
dealer. Any person licensed in another state to sell new or used
motor vehicles, who offers a motor vehicle for sale within this
state at a motor vehicle auction which is limited to dealer-to-
dealer transactions, shall not be within the definition of "owner"
in Section 1102 of this title, for purposes of Section 1101 et seq.
of this title. If Service Oklahoma, the Oklahoma New Motor Vehicle
Commission, or the Oklahoma Used Motor Vehicle, Dismantler, and
Manufactured Housing Commission finds that a person under its
jurisdiction has not complied with this section or falsified an
inspection form, the person's authority to perform an inspection
under this section may be suspended or revoked; and Service
Oklahoma, the Oklahoma New Motor Vehicle Commission, or the Oklahoma
Used Motor Vehicle, Dismantler, and Manufactured Housing Commission
may take further punitive action, including, but not limited to,
fines, suspension or revocation of the person's license to conduct
business.
N. A licensed motor vehicle dealer, upon payment of a fee of
Fifteen Dollars ($15.00), may reassign an out-of-state certificate
of title to a used motor vehicle provided such licensed dealer
obtains the appropriate inspection form required by either
subsection L or M of this section and attaches the form to the out-
of-state certificate of title. Licensed operators shall be allowed
to retain Two Dollars and twenty-five cents ($2.25) of the fee plus
an additional Two Dollars ($2.00) or Three Dollars ($3.00) as
provided in subsections L and M of this section for performance of
ENR. H. B. NO. 3148 Page 12

the inspection. Two Dollars ($2.00) of the fee shall be deposited
in the Service Oklahoma Reimbursement Fund. An out-of-state vehicle
which has been rebuilt shall be inspected pursuant to the provisions
of Section 1111 of this title. Service Oklahoma shall train
licensed operators in interpreting vehicle identification numbers to
assure that it accurately describes the vehicle and to detect
rollback or alteration of the odometer. Failure of a licensed
operator to inspect the vehicle and make the required notations
shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for the first offense and Five Thousand
Dollars ($5,000.00) for the second offense or subsequent offense, or
by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months,
or by both such fine and imprisonment.
O. The ownership of any unrecovered vehicle which has been
declared a total loss by an insurer because of theft shall be
transferred to the insurer by an unrecovered-theft vehicle title;
provided, the ownership of any such vehicle which has been declared
a total loss by an insurer licensed by the Insurance Department of
the State of Oklahoma and maintaining a multi-state motor vehicle
salvage processing center in this state shall be transferred to the
insurer by a salvage or an unrecovered-theft title without the
requirement of a visual inspection of the vehicle identification
number by the insurer. Upon recovery of the vehicle, the ownership
shall be transferred by an original title, salvage title, or junked
title, as may be appropriate based upon an estimate of the amount of
loss submitted by the insurer.
P. When an insurance company makes a total loss settlement on a
total loss vehicle and the insurance company or a salvage pool
authorized by the insurance company is unable to obtain the properly
endorsed certificate of ownership or other evidence of ownership
acceptable to Service Oklahoma within thirty (30) days following
acceptance by the owner of an offer of an amount in settlement of a
total loss, that insurance company or salvage pool, on a form
provided by Service Oklahoma and signed under penalty of perjury,
may request Service Oklahoma to issue the applicable salvage title
for the vehicle. The request shall include information declaring
that the requester has made at least two written attempts to obtain
the certificate of ownership or other acceptable evidence of title.
Q. The owner of any vehicle which is incapable of operation or
use on the public roads and has no resale value, except as parts,
scrap, or junk, may deliver the certificate of title to the vehicle
to Service Oklahoma for cancellation. Upon verification that any
ENR. H. B. NO. 3148 Page 13

perfected lien against the vehicle has been released, the
certificate of title shall be canceled without any fee, charge, or
cost required from the owner. The vehicle identification numbers on
the certificates of title shall be preserved in the computer files
of Service Oklahoma for at least five (5) years from the date of
cancellation of the certificate of title. Service Oklahoma shall
prescribe and provide an affidavit form to be completed by the owner
of any vehicle for which the certificate of title is canceled. No
title or registration shall subsequently be issued for a vehicle for
which the certificate of title has been surrendered pursuant to this
subsection. Service Oklahoma shall prescribe a form for the
transfer of ownership of a vehicle for which the certificate of
title has been canceled.
R. The owner of a vehicle which is not within the last ten (10)
model years, not roadworthy and not capable of repair for operation
or use on the roads and highways, or a vehicle which is being sold
to a scrap metal dealer pursuant to Section 11-92 of Title 2 of the
Oklahoma Statutes, shall transfer the vehicle only upon a
certificate of ownership prescribed by Service Oklahoma, if the
certificate of title to the vehicle is lost, has been canceled, or
otherwise not available. The prescribed ownership form shall
include the names and addresses of the buyer and seller, the driver
license number or Social Security number of the seller, the make and
model of the vehicle, and the public vehicle identification number.
If there is no public vehicle identification number, the vehicle
shall be inspected by a law enforcement officer to verify the
absence of the number on the vehicle and the prescribed ownership
form shall include a signed statement, by such officer, verifying
the absence of the number.
The certificate of ownership shall be completed in triplicate.
The buyer and seller shall each retain a copy. Within thirty (30)
days of the transaction, the seller shall submit one copy to Service
Oklahoma or a licensed operator accompanied with a fee of Four
Dollars ($4.00). One Dollar ($1.00) shall be retained by the
licensed operator and Three Dollars ($3.00) shall be deposited in
the Oklahoma Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund in the State Treasury
through December 31, 2022, and beginning January 1, 2023, this fee
shall be deposited in the Service Oklahoma Reimbursement Fund.
Upon receipt of the certificate, Service Oklahoma shall verify
that any perfected lien upon the vehicle has been released. If the
lien is not released, Service Oklahoma shall mail notice of the
transfer to the lienholder at the lienholder's last-known address.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3148 Page 14

If a certificate of title has been issued, it shall be canceled and
the vehicle identification number shall be preserved in the computer
of Service Oklahoma for at least five (5) years. The buyer of the
vehicle may not be sued and shall not be liable for monetary damages
to the lienholder, however, the vehicle shall be subject to a valid
repossession by a lienholder.
S. Service Oklahoma shall notify the chief administrative
officer of the agency or department responsible for issuing motor
vehicle certificates of title in each state in the United States of
the types of motor vehicle certificate of title effective in
Oklahoma on and after January 1, 1989.
T. When registering for the first time in this state a
remanufactured vehicle which has not been registered in any other
state since its remanufacture, before issuing a certificate of
title, Service Oklahoma shall require the applicant to deliver a
statement of origin from the remanufacturer.
U. If a vehicle is sold to a foreign buyer pursuant to the
provisions of the Automotive Dismantlers and Parts Recycler Act, the
licensed seller shall stamp the title with: "EXPORT ONLY.
NONTRANSFERABLE IN THE UNITED STATES." The licensed seller shall
supply Service Oklahoma the title number, the vehicle identification
number and the foreign buyer's bid identification number on a form
prescribed by Service Oklahoma. Service Oklahoma shall cancel the
title, and the vehicle identification number shall be preserved in
the computer files of Service Oklahoma for a period of not less than
five (5) years.
V. Service Oklahoma shall not be considered a necessary party
to any lawsuit which is instigated for the purpose of determining
ownership of a vehicle, wherein Service Oklahoma's only involvement
would be to issue title, and the court shall issue an order
dismissing Service Oklahoma from the pending action. In the event
no other party or lienholder can be identified as to ownership or
claim, Service Oklahoma shall accept an affidavit of ownership from
the party claiming ownership and issue proper title thereon.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1105.3, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1105.3. Every vehicle shall have and contain a vehicle
identification number, which number shall not be obliterated,
erased, mutilated, removed, or missing. This section shall not
ENR. H. B. NO. 3148 Page 15

affect those persons authorized by law to have in their possession a
motor vehicle on which the manufacturer's number or numbers have
been obliterated, erased, mutilated, removed, or missing. For the
purposes of this section, "persons authorized by law" shall include
salvage pools authorized to store vehicles for insurance companies
which are requiring inspection.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3148 Page 16

Passed the House of Representatives the 5th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 5th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3148 Page 17